Florida, session 2026, HB5501.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
201.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
201.15 Distribution of taxes collected.—All taxes
collected under this chapter are hereby pledged and shall be
first made available to make payments when due on bonds issued
pursuant to s. 215.618 or s. 215.619, or any other bonds
authorized to be issued on a parity basis with such bonds. Such
pledge and availability for the payment of these bonds shall
have priority over any requirement for the payment of service
charges or costs of collection and enforcement under this
section. All taxes collected under this chapter, except taxes
distributed to the Land Acquisition Trust Fund pursuant to
subsections (1) and (2), are subject to the service charge
imposed in s. 215.20(1). Before distribution pursuant to this
section, the Department of Revenue shall deduct amounts
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5501 2026
necessary to pay the costs of the collection and enforcement of
the tax levied by this chapter. The costs and service charge may
not be levied against any portion of taxes pledged to debt
service on bonds to the extent that the costs and service charge
are required to pay any amounts relating to the bonds. All of
the costs of the collection and enforcement of the tax levied by
this chapter and service charge shall be available and
transferred to the extent necessary to pay debt service and any
other amounts payable with respect to bonds authorized before
January 1, 2017, secured by revenues distributed pursuant to
this section. All taxes remaining after deduction of costs shall
be distributed as follows:
(4) After the required distributions to the Land
Acquisition Trust Fund pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) and
deduction of the service charge imposed pursuant to s.
215.20(1), the remainder shall be distributed as follows:
(a) The lesser of 20.5453 percent of the remainder or
$420.08 $360.08 million in each fiscal year shall be paid into
the State Treasury to the credit of the State Transportation
Trust Fund. Notwithstanding any other law, the amount credited
to the State Transportation Trust Fund shall be used for:
1. The Small County Outreach Program specified in s.
339.2818, in the amount of 11 13 percent of the funds;
2. The Strategic Intermodal System specified in ss.
339.61, 339.62, 339.63, and 339.64, in the amount of 67 78
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5501 2026
percent of the funds; and
3. The Transportation Regional Incentive Program specified
in s. 339.2819, in the amount of 8 9 percent of the funds; and
4. The Florida Rail Enterprise for the purpose established
in s. 341.303, in the amount of 14 percent of the funds.
Section 2. Subsection (4) of section 343.58, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
343.58 County funding for the South Florida Regional
Transportation Authority.—
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary and effective July 1, 2010, until as provided in
paragraph (d) (c), the department shall transfer annually from
the State Transportation Trust Fund to the South Florida
Regional Transportation Authority the amounts specified in
subparagraph (a)1. or subparagraph (a)2.
(a)1. If the authority becomes responsible for maintaining
and dispatching the South Florida Rail Corridor:
a. $15 million from the State Transportation Trust Fund to
the South Florida Regional Transportation Authority for
operations, maintenance, and dispatch; and
b. An amount no less than the work program commitments
equal to $27.1 million for fiscal year 2010-2011, as of July 1,
2009, for operating assistance to the authority and corridor
track maintenance and contract maintenance for the South Florida
Rail Corridor.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5501 2026
2. If the authority does not become responsible for
maintaining and dispatching the South Florida Rail Corridor:
a. $13.3 million from the State Transportation Trust Fund
to the South Florida Regional Transportation Authority for
operations; and
b. An amount no less than the work program commitments
equal to $17.3 million for fiscal year 2010-2011, as of July 1,
2009, for operating assistance to the authority.
(b) Funding required by this subsection may not be
provided from the funds dedicated to the Florida Rail Enterprise
pursuant to s. 201.15(4)(a)4.
(c)(b)1. Funds provided to the authority by the department
under this subsection constitute state financial assistance
provided to a nonstate entity to carry out a state project
subject to ss. 215.97 and 215.971. The department shall provide
the funds in accordance with the terms of a written agreement to
be entered into between the authority and the department, which
shall provide for department review, approval, and audit of
authority expenditure of such funds and shall include such other
provisions as are required by applicable law. The department is
specifically authorized to agree to advance the authority 25
percent of the total funds provided under this subsection for a
state fiscal year at the beginning of each state fiscal year,
with monthly payments over the fiscal year on a reimbursement
100 basis as supported by invoices and such additional documentation
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5501 2026
101 and information as the department may reasonably require and a
102 reconciliation of the advance against remaining invoices in the
103 last quarter of the fiscal year.
104 2. To enable the department to evaluate the authority's
105 proposed uses of state funds, the authority shall annually
106 provide the department with its proposed budget for the
107 following authority fiscal year and shall promptly provide the
108 department with any additional documentation or information
109 required by the department for its evaluation of the proposed
110 uses of the state funds.
111 (d)(c) Funding required by this subsection shall cease
112 upon commencement of an alternate dedicated local funding source
113 sufficient for the authority to meet its responsibilities for
114 operating, maintaining, and dispatching the South Florida Rail
115 Corridor. The authority and the department shall cooperate in
116 the effort to identify and implement such an alternate dedicated
117 local funding source before July 1, 2019. Upon commencement of
118 the alternate dedicated local funding source, the department
119 shall convey to the authority a perpetual commuter rail easement
120 in the South Florida Rail Corridor and all of the department's
121 right, title, and interest in rolling stock, equipment, tracks,
122 and other personal property owned and used by the department for
123 the operation and maintenance of the commuter rail operations in
124 the South Florida Rail Corridor.
125 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5501-00